Missouri, session 2026, HB2808.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 568, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 568.076, to read as follows:
568.076. 1. A person commits the offense of permitting, encouraging, aiding, or
causing a minor to commit an offense if the person is a parent to the minor and the
person knowingly permits, encourages, aides, or causes the minor to commit an offense
in violation of state or federal law.
2. The offense of permitting, encouraging, aiding, or causing a minor to commit
an offense is a:
(1) Class A misdemeanor if the offense committed by the minor was a felony
offense; or
(2) Class C misdemeanor if the offense committed by the minor was a
misdemeanor offense.
3. Each violation of this section shall constitute a separate offense.
4. In addition to any other penalties, upon a plea or finding of guilt under this
section, the court may order the person to make restitution to any individual who has
suffered damages as a result of the offense committed by the minor. The person shall be
entitled to a hearing on any restitution amount prior to imposition of the restitution.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2808 2
5. As used in this section, "minor" means an individual who is under eighteen
years of age.
✔